en: Water Filter Housings
xx: Water Filter Housings
cs: Pouzdra na vodní filtry
da: Vandfilterhuse
de: Wasserfiltergehäuse
es: Cajas de filtro de agua
fr: Boîtiers pour filtres à eau
it: Contenitori filtri acqua
ja: 浄水器ハウジング
nl: Waterfilterbehuizingen
no: Vannfiltreringskabinetter
pl: Obudowy do filtrów wody
pt: Suportes para filtro de água
ru: Корпуса фильтров для воды
sv: Vattenfilterhus
tr: Su Arıtma Cihazı Mahfazaları

en: Water Softener Salt
xx: Water Softener Salt
cs: Sůl na změkčení vody
da: Vandblødgører – salt
de: Salz zur Wasserenthärtung
es: Sal para descalcificadores de agua
fr: Sel pour adoucisseur d'eau
it: Sale anticalcare
ja: 軟水器用塩
nl: Zout voor waterontharding
no: Salt til vannbløting
pl: Sól do zmiękczania wody
pt: Sal para abrandador de água
ru: Соль для умягчения воды
sv: Vattenmjukgöringssalt
tr: Su Yumuşatıcı Tuzu

en: Water Softeners
xx: Water Softeners
cs: Změkčovače vody
da: Vandblødgørere
de: Wasserenthärter
es: Descalcificadores
fr: Adoucisseurs d'eau
it: Addolcitori
ja: 軟水器
nl: Waterverzachters
no: Vannbløtemidler
pl: Zmiękczacze wody
pt: Amaciador de água
ru: Умягчители воды
sv: Vattenmjukgörare
tr: Su Yumuşatıcılar

en: Water Levelers
xx: Water Levelers
cs: Zařízení na vyrovnávání vodní hladiny
da: Vandstandsmålere
de: Wasserstandsregler
es: Niveladores de agua
fr: Régulateurs de niveau d'eau
it: Livellatori acqua
ja: 水位調整器
nl: Waterpasinstrumenten
no: Nivåregulatorer
pl: Kontrolery poziomu wody
pt: Niveladores de água
ru: Регуляторы уровня воды
sv: Utjämnare för vattennivå
tr: Su Seviyesi Tespit Cihazları

en: Water Timers
xx: Water Timers
cs: Časovače na spuštění vody
da: Vandtimere
de: Wasserschaltuhren
es: Temporizadores de riego
fr: Programmateurs d'arrosage
it: Timer per acqua
ja: 通水タイマー
nl: Watertimer
no: Vanntimere
pl: Sterowniki nawadniania
pt: Temporizadores de água
ru: Таймеры для воды
sv: Vattentimers
tr: Su Zamanlayıcıları

en: Well Supplies
xx: Well Supplies
cs: Vybavení studní
da: Tilbehør til brønde
de: Brunnenbedarf
es: Abastecimientos para pozos
fr: Accessoires pour puits
it: Articoli per pozzi
ja: 井戸用品
nl: Putbenodigdheden
no: Brønnutstyr
pl: Akcesoria do studni
pt: Suprimentos para poços
ru: Оборудование для колодцев и скважин
sv: Brunnstillbehör
tr: Su Kuyusu Malzemeleri

en: Power & Electrical Supplies
xx: Power & Electrical Supplies
cs: Elektroinstalace
da: Eludstyr
de: Elektrobedarf
es: Suministros eléctricos
fr: Accessoires électriques
it: Forniture elettriche
ja: 電力供給装置
nl: Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden
no: Elektrisk utstyr
pl: Materiały elektryczne
pt: Suprimentos elétricos
ru: Товары для систем электроснабжения
sv: Eltillbehör
tr: Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Armatures\, Rotors & Stators
xx: Armatures\, Rotors & Stators
cs: Armatury\, rotory a statory
da: Induktorer\, rotorer og statorer
de: Anker\, Rotoren und Statoren
es: Armaduras\, rotores y estatores
fr: Armatures\, rotors et stators
it: Armature\, rotori e statori
ja: アーマチャー、ローター、ステーター
nl: Armaturen\, rotors en stators
no: Armatur\, rotorer og statorer
pl: Wirniki i stojany
pt: Armações\, rotores e estatores
ru: Роторы\, статоры\, якоря
sv: Armaturer\, rotorer och statorer
tr: Armatürler\, Rotorlar ve Statörler

en: Ballasts & Starters
xx: Ballasts & Starters
cs: Předřadníky a startéry
da: Ballast og startere
de: Vorschaltgeräte & Starter
es: Balastos y arranques
fr: Ballasts et démarreurs
it: Resistenze e starter
ja: バラスト・スターター
nl: Ballasten en starters
no: Elektroniske ballaster og startere
pl: Dławiki i startery
pt: Reatores e starters
ru: Пускорегулирующая аппаратура
sv: Förkopplingsdon och startanordningar
tr: Ayar Rezistansları ve Starterler

en: Carbon Brushes
xx: Carbon Brushes
cs: Uhlíkové kartáčky
da: Kulkontakter
de: Kohlebürsten
es: Escobillas de carbono
fr: Balais de charbon
it: Spazzole di carbonio
ja: カーボンブラシ
nl: Koolborstels
no: Kullbørster
pl: Szczotki węglowe
pt: Escovas de carvão
ru: Угольные щётки
sv: Kolborstar
tr: Kömür Fırçaları

en: Circuit Breaker Panels
xx: Circuit Breaker Panels
cs: Rozvaděče
da: Afbryderpaneler
de: Verteilerkästen
es: Cuadros de distribución
fr: Tableaux électriques
it: Pannelli per interruttori
ja: ブレーカーパネル
nl: Zekeringpanelen
no: Automatsikringspaneler
pl: Tablice bezpiecznikowe
pt: Quadros de distribuição
ru: Электрические щиты
sv: Säkringsskåp
tr: Devre Kesici Paneller

en: Conduit & Housings
xx: Conduit & Housings
cs: Vedení kabelů a kryty
da: Ledninger og huse
de: Leitungen & Gehäuse
es: Conductos y carcasas
fr: Tuyaux et gaines
it: Tubi e alloggiamenti
ja: コンジット・ハウジング
nl: Leidingen en dozen
no: Ledningsrør og -deksler
pl: Osłony i izolacje kabli
pt: Conduítes e compartimentos
ru: Кабелепроводы и коробы
sv: Ledningar och höljen
tr: Oluk ve Muhafazalar

en: Electrical Conduit
xx: Electrical Conduit
cs: Husí krky
da: Ledningsrør
de: Kabelkanäle
es: Conducto eléctrico
fr: Gaine électrique
it: Condotti elettrici
ja: 電線管
nl: Elektriciteitsleidingen
no: Elektriske rørledninger
pl: Osłony do kabli i przewodów elektrycznych
pt: Eletrodutos
ru: Кабелепроводы
sv: Elledningsrör
tr: Kablo Kanalı

en: Heat-Shrink Tubing
xx: Heat-Shrink Tubing
cs: Smršťovací bužírky
da: Krybeflex
de: Schrumpfschläuche
es: Tubo termorretráctil
fr: Tubes thermorétrécissables
it: Guaine termorestringenti
ja: 熱収縮チューブ
nl: Krimpkousen
no: Krympestrømper
pl: Koszulki termokurczliwe
pt: Tubos termorretráteis
ru: Термоусадочные трубки
sv: Krympslangar
tr: Isıyla Daralan Makaronlar

en: Electrical Motors
xx: Electrical Motors
cs: Elektromotory
da: Elektriske motorer
de: Elektromotoren
es: Motores eléctricos
fr: Moteurs électriques
it: Motori elettrici
ja: 電気モーター
nl: Elektromotors
no: Elektriske motorer
pl: Silniki elektryczne
pt: Motores elétricos
ru: Электродвигатели
sv: Elmotorer
tr: Elektrik Motorları

en: Electrical Mount Boxes & Brackets
xx: Electrical Mount Boxes & Brackets
cs: Elektroinstalační krabice a konzoly
da: Monteringsbokse og beslag
de: Anschlussdosen & Halterungen
es: Escuadras y cajas de montaje eléctricas
fr: Boîtiers de fixation électriques
it: Scatole di derivazione e staffe
ja: マウントボックス・ブラケット
nl: Opbouwcontactdozen en -beugels
no: Monteringsbokser og braketter
pl: Skrzynki montażowe i uchwyty
pt: Caixas e braçadeiras de montagem
ru: Электрические распределительные коробки и кронштейны
sv: Monteringsboxar och fästen
tr: Elektrikli Montaj Kutuları ve Braketleri

en: Electrical Plug Caps
xx: Electrical Plug Caps
cs: Záslepky do zásuvek
da: Stikkontaktbeskytter
de: Steckdosenabdeckungen
es: Protectores de enchufes
fr: Cache-prises électriques
it: Copriprese elettriche
ja: コンセントキャップ
nl: Stekkerafdekking
no: Stikkontaktdeksler
pl: Zabezpieczenia do kontaktów
pt: Protetores de tomadas
ru: Колпачки для электрических вилок
sv: Skyddsproppar för eluttag
tr: Priz Kapatıcılar

en: Electrical Switches
xx: Electrical Switches
cs: Elektrické spínače
da: Kontakter
de: Elektroschalter
es: Interruptores eléctricos
fr: Interrupteurs
it: Interruttori elettrici
ja: 電気スイッチ
nl: Elektrische schakelaars
no: Strømbrytere
pl: Przełączniki elektryczne
pt: Interruptores elétricos
ru: Электровыключатели
sv: Elektriska brytare
tr: Elektrik Anahtarları

en: Light Switches
xx: Light Switches
cs: Vypínače osvětlení
da: Lyskontakter
de: Lichtschalter
es: Interruptores de luz
fr: Interrupteurs lumineux
it: Interruttori della luce
ja: 照明用スイッチ
nl: Lichtschakelaars
no: Lysbrytere
pl: Włączniki światła
pt: Interruptores de luz
ru: Выключатели
sv: Strömbrytare
tr: Aydınlatma Anahtarları

en: Specialty Electrical Switches & Relays
xx: Specialty Electrical Switches & Relays
cs: Speciální elektrické spínače
da: Specielle elektriske kontakter
de: Spezielle elektrische Schalter
es: Interruptores eléctricos de especialidad
fr: Interrupteurs électriques spéciaux
it: Interruttori elettrici speciali
ja: 特殊電源スイッチ
nl: Speciale elektrische schakelaars
no: Elektriske spesialbrytere
pl: Specjalne włączniki światła
pt: Interruptores elétricos especiais
ru: Специализированные выключатели
sv: Specialströmbrytare
tr: Özel Elektrikli Anahtarlar